Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Judicial Dissolution.

§79-4-14.30.
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

The chancery court may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by the Attorney General if it is established that:

In a proceeding by a shareholder if it is established that:

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision; or

In a proceeding by a shareholder if the corporation has abandoned its business and has failed within a reasonable time to liquidate and distribute its assets and dissolve.

The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud;

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered, or the business and affairs of the corporation can no longer be conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally, because of the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive or fraudulent;

The shareholders are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two (2) consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired; or

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted;

The creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment return unsatisfied, and the corporation is insolvent; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent; or

Subsection (a)(2) shall not apply in the case of a corporation that, on the date of the filing of the proceeding, has shares that are:(i) listed on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange, or any exchange owned or operated by the NASDAQ Stock Market, LLC, or listed or quoted on a system owned or operated by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.; or (ii) not so listed or quoted, but are held by at least three hundred (300) shareholders and the shares outstanding have a market value of at least Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) (exclusive of the value of such shares held by the corporation’s subsidiaries, senior executives, directors and beneficial shareholders owning more than ten percent (10%) of such shares).

In this section “beneficial shareholder” has the meaning specified in Section 79-4-13.01(2).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.30; Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

Pursuant to
Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in (b) by substituting “Subsection (a)(2)” for “ Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2).” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 1, 2013, meeting.

The 2007 amendment added (b) and (c); designated the previously existing provisions as (a); added (a)(5); and made a minor stylistic change.

Right to challenge corporation’s power to act in proceeding brought by Attorney General for judicial dissolution, see § 79-4-3.04.

Venue for proceeding for judicial dissolution brought by any party named in this section, see § 79-4-14.31.

Required notice, upon commencement of proceeding under § 79-4-14.30 to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, of option to avoid dissolution by elective buyout of petitioner’s shares, see § 79-4-14.31.

Entering of decree of judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.33.

Dissolution of corporation the shares of which are not listed on national securities exchange or regularly traded in market maintained by members of national or affiliated securities association, see § 79-4-14.34.

Dissolution of professional corporation by Attorney General, see § 79-10-85.

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-355 through 79-11-361.

Chancellor’s corporate dissolution order did not exceed the pleadings because (1) such a claim was adequately pled, (2) the chancellor did not have to grant an election to purchase shares before exercising broad equity powers under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.34(i), (3) the chancellor could grant alternate remedies, since dissolution was not ordered, and (4) fiduciary breach was adequately claimed. Scafidi v. Hille, 180 So.3d 634, 2015 Miss. LEXIS 603 (Miss. 2015).

Appellant stated a claim for dissolution of the corporation because the agreement in question might be invalid as applied to appellant due to oppressive or fraudulent conduct, in which case she would be entitled to the fair value of her share, and dismissal of her claim was reversed; other shareholders offered her only $ 900,000 for her share, when she allegedly had been offered $ 1.5 million by an outsider, and there was a question of fact whether the price had been previously set at an annual meeting by secret ballot. Chain v. Ormonde Plantation, Inc., — So.3d —, 2020 Miss. App. LEXIS 98 (Miss. Ct. App. Mar. 31, 2020).

Preferred stockholder’s rights, upon liquidation or dissolution, to dividends. 25 A.L.R.2d 788.

Stockholders’ rights to patent, copyright, or trademark owned by corporation on dissolution thereof.
30 A.L.R.2d 938.

What amounts to “oppressive” conduct under statute authorizing dissolution of corporation at suit of minority stockholders.
56 A.L.R.3d 358.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension.
83 A.L.R.3d 458.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

Relief other than by dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension. 34 A.L.R.4th 13.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2351, 2360 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:800.

5 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 645, Oppressive Conduct by Majority Shareholders, Directors, or Those in Control of Corporation.

6 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 387, Dissension or Deadlock of Corporate Directors or Shareholders.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1641-1645, 1648, 1655, 1694 et seq.

1984 Mississippi Supreme Court Review: Corporate, Contract and Commercial Law. 55 Miss. L. J. 65.

§79-4-14.31.
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

Venue for a proceeding brought by any party named in Section 79-4-14.30 lies in the county where a corporation’s principal office is or was located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state.

It is not necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

Within ten (10) days of the commencement of a proceeding under Section 79-4-14.30(2) to dissolve a corporation that is not a public corporation, the corporation shall send to all shareholders, other than the petitioner, a notice stating that the shareholders are entitled to avoid the dissolution of the corporation by electing to purchase the petitioner’s shares under Section 79-4-14.34 and accompanied by a copy of Section 79-4-14.34.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.31; Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 12; Laws, 1994, ch. 417, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 13; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 40, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment, in (d), substituted “is not a public corporation” for “has no shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association,” and near the end of the section, inserted “and” following “Section 79-4-14.34.”

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (a).

Dissolution of professional corporation by Attorney General, see § 79-10-85.

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-355 through 79-11-361.

The conditions which must be shown in order to entitle a stockholder to have a dissolution of a corporation and a receiver appointed are the insolvency of the corporation, or that the corporation ceases to be a going concern, or while not solvent the corporation sells its franchises in whole or in part. Welsh v. Clinton Lumber & Supply Co., 232 Miss. 507, 99 So. 2d 660, 1958 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1958).

An order for the dissolution of a corporation and the appointment of a receiver was void where the petition for the dissolution of the corporation and the appointment of the receiver did not allege the existence of any emergency justifying the appointment of a receiver without notice, and the president and vice president, who owned the majority of the stock, were not given notice, and no bond was executed, as required by Code 1942, § 1357. Welsh v. Clinton Lumber & Supply Co., 232 Miss. 507, 99 So. 2d 660, 1958 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1958).

Chancellor was justified in terminating the receivership and returning the assets to the corporation where the entire proceedings wherein the dissolution of the corporation was ordered and the receiver appointed were void for want of notice to other stockholders, and for failure to post the receiver’s bond, without regard to the fact that the president and vice president, who were majority stockholders of the corporation, failed to testify in the case. Welsh v. Clinton Lumber & Supply Co., 232 Miss. 507, 99 So. 2d 660, 1958 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1958).

In order for minority stockholders in a domestic corporation to put an end to the corporation by requiring its dissolution, there must be either insolvency or mismanagement which must lead to insolvency. Kiersky v. Hyman Mercantile Co., 192 Miss. 195, 4 So. 2d 881, 198 So. 574 (Miss. 1941).

A minority of stockholders may have a receiver appointed, in equity, on the ground of maladministration, where the corporation is solvent, for the purpose of taking charge of and winding up the business if necessary. Brent v. B. E. Brister Sawmill Co., 103 Miss. 876, 60 So. 1018, 1912 Miss. LEXIS 244 (Miss. 1912).

A receiver of an insolvent corporation, whether public or private, in possession of its entire property, will be required to pay the wages of laborers who rendered services shortly before his appointment which were necessary to continue the business of the corporation and preserve its property in preference to both ordinary and mortgage creditors. L'Hote v. Boyet, 85 Miss. 636, 38 So. 1, 1904 Miss. LEXIS 176 (Miss. 1904).

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension.
83 A.L.R.3d 458.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2351.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1694 et seq.

§79-4-14.32.
Receivership or custodianship.

Unless an election to purchase has been filed under Section 79-4-14.34, a court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the business and affairs of the corporation.The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian.The court appointing a receiver or custodian has jurisdiction over the corporation and all its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign corporation (authorized to transact business in this state) as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and (ii) may sue and defend in his own name as receiver of the corporation in all courts of this state;

The custodian may exercise all the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its shareholders and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation, its shareholders and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.32; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendment, in (a), added “Unless an election to purchase has been filed under Section 79-4-14.34” to the beginning of the first sentence and deleted “exclusive” preceding “jurisdiction” in the last sentence; and in (e), substituted “expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the assets” for “expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and his counsel from the assets.”

Dissolution of professional corporation by Attorney General, see § 79-10-85.

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-355 through 79-11-361.

In an action involving a controversy among present and former members of a medical partnership which partnership leased its building from a corporation organized by the partners, the court improperly ordered that the corporation be liquidated, where the alleged conduct by the directors of the corporation consisting of their failing to reelect two directors as directors of the corporation after they withdrew from the medical partnership resulting in these two directors’ deferred compensation of $100 per month being terminated was not “oppressive” conduct within the meaning of § 79-3-193. Kisner v. Coffey, 418 So. 2d 58, 1982 Miss. LEXIS 2092 (Miss. 1982).

In an action by a minority shareholder to compel dissolution of a corporation on grounds of oppressive conduct that arose after the minority shareholder, who had an agreement with the former owners and majority shareholders to manage the corporation until its indebtedness was retired, was terminated by the new owners of the corporation prior to retirement of the debts, the chancery court erred in ordering dissolution, where the contract provided for the majority shareholders to buy the plaintiff’s stock at book value, and where plaintiff’s management of the corporation was inadequate; the statute does not sanction dissolution where the complaining party’s reasonable expectations have been thwarted, but not grossly so. Capitol Toyota, Inc. v. Gervin, 381 So. 2d 1038, 1980 Miss. LEXIS 1929 (Miss. 1980).

An order for the dissolution of a corporation and the appointment of a receiver was void where the petition for the dissolution of the corporation and the appointment of the receiver did not allege the existence of any emergency justifying the appointment of a receiver without notice, and the president and vice-president, who owned the majority of the stock, were not given notice, and no bond was executed, as required by Code 1942, § 1357. Welsh v. Clinton Lumber & Supply Co., 232 Miss. 507, 99 So. 2d 660, 1958 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1958).

Chancellor was justified in terminating the receivership and returning the assets to the corporation where the entire proceedings wherein the dissolution of the corporation was ordered and the receiver appointed were void for want of notice to other stockholders, and for failure to post the receiver’s bond, without regard to the fact that the president and vice president, who were majority stockholders of the corporation, failed to testify in the case. Welsh v. Clinton Lumber & Supply Co., 232 Miss. 507, 99 So. 2d 660, 1958 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1958).

The conditions which must be shown in order to entitle a stockholder to have a dissolution of a corporation and a receiver appointed are the insolvency of the corporation, or that the corporation ceases to be a going concern, or while not solvent the corporation sells its franchises in whole or in part. Welsh v. Clinton Lumber & Supply Co., 232 Miss. 507, 99 So. 2d 660, 1958 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1958).

In order for minority stockholders in a domestic corporation to put an end to the corporation by requiring its dissolution, there must be either insolvency or mismanagement which must lead to insolvency. Kiersky v. Hyman Mercantile Co., 192 Miss. 195, 4 So. 2d 881, 198 So. 574 (Miss. 1941).

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension.
83 A.L.R.3d 458.

65 Am. Jur. 2d, Receivers §§ 39 et seq.

75 C.J.S., Receivers §§ 71 et seq.

§79-4-14.33.
Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in Section 79-4-14.30 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s business and affairs in accordance with Section 79-4-14.05 and the notification of claimants in accordance with Sections 79-4-14.06 and 79-4-14.07.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.33, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Dissolution of professional corporation by Attorney General, see § 79-10-85.

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-355 through 79-11-361.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2471.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1704, 1716, 1725.

§79-4-14.34.
Election to purchase in lieu of dissolution.

In a proceeding under Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2) to dissolve a corporation, the corporation may elect or, if it fails to elect, one or more shareholders may elect to purchase all shares owned by the petitioning shareholder at the fair value of the shares.An election pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable unless the court determines that it is equitable to set aside or modify the election.

An election to purchase pursuant to this section may be filed with the court at any time within ninety (90) days after the filing of the petition under Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2) or at such later time as the court in its discretion may allow. If the election to purchase is filed by one or more shareholders, the corporation shall, within ten (10) days thereafter, give written notice to all shareholders, other than the petitioner. The notice must state the name and number of shares owned by the petitioner and the name and number of shares owned by each electing shareholder and must advise the recipients of their right to join in the election to purchase shares in accordance with this section. Shareholders who wish to participate must file notice of their intention to join in the purchase no later than thirty (30) days after the effective date of the notice to them. All shareholders who have filed an election or notice of their intention to participate in the election to purchase thereby become parties to the proceeding and shall participate in the purchase in proportion to their ownership of shares as of the date the first election was filed, unless they otherwise agree or the court otherwise directs. After an election has been filed by the corporation or one or more shareholders, the proceeding under Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2) may not be discontinued or settled, nor may the petitioning shareholder sell or otherwise dispose of his shares, unless the court determines that it would be equitable to the corporation and the shareholders, other than the petitioner, to permit such discontinuance, settlement, sale or other disposition.

If, within sixty (60) days of the filing of the first election, the parties reach agreement as to the fair value and terms of purchase of the petitioner’s shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase of petitioner’s shares upon the terms and conditions agreed to by the parties.

If the parties are unable to reach an agreement as provided for in subsection (c), the court, upon application of any party, shall stay the Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2) proceedings and determine the fair value of the petitioner’s shares as of the day before the date on which the petition under Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2) was filed or as of such other date as the court deems appropriate under the circumstances.

Upon determining the fair value of the shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase upon such terms and conditions as the court deems appropriate, which may include payment of the purchase price in installments, where necessary in the interests of equity, provision for security to assure payment of the purchase price and any additional costs, fees and expenses as may have been awarded, and, if the shares are to be purchased by shareholders, the allocation of shares among them. In allocating petitioner’s shares among holders of different classes of shares, the court should attempt to preserve the existing distribution of voting rights among holders of different classes insofar as practicable and may direct that holders of a specific class or classes shall not participate in the purchase. Interest may be allowed at the rate and from the date determined by the court to be equitable, but if the court finds that the refusal of the petitioning shareholder to accept an offer of payment was arbitrary or otherwise not in good faith, no interest shall be allowed. If the court finds that the petitioning shareholder had probable grounds for relief under Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2)(ii) or (iv), it may award to the petitioning shareholder reasonable fees and expenses of counsel and of any experts employed by him.

Upon entry of an order under subsection (c) or (e), the court shall dismiss the petition to dissolve the corporation under Section 79-4-14.30, and the petitioning shareholder shall no longer have any rights or status as a shareholder of the corporation, except the right to receive the amounts awarded to him by the order of the court which shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other judgment.

The purchase ordered pursuant to subsection (e) shall be made within ten (10) days after the date the order becomes final unless before that time the corporation files with the court a notice of its intention to adopt articles of dissolution pursuant to Sections 79-4-14.02 and 79-4-14.03, which articles must then be adopted and filed within fifty (50) days thereafter. Upon filing of such articles of dissolution, the corporation shall be dissolved in accordance with the provisions of Sections 79-4-14.05 through 79-4-14.07 and the order entered pursuant to subsection (e) shall no longer be of any force or effect, except that the court may award the petitioning shareholder reasonable fees and expenses in accordance with the provisions of the last sentence of subsection (e) and the petitioner may continue to pursue any claims previously asserted on behalf of the corporation.

Any payment by the corporation pursuant to an order under subsection (c) or (e), other than an award of fees and expenses pursuant to subsection (e), is subject to the provisions of Section 79-4-6.40.

Nothing contained in this section shall diminish the inherent equity powers of the court to fashion alternative remedies to judicial dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 11; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 14; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, an error in a statutory reference in the section was corrected by substituting “Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2)” for “Section 79-4-14.30(2)” everywhere it appears.

The 2006 amendment substituted “is not a public corporation” for “has no shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association” in the first sentence of (a); substituted “relief under Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2)(ii) or (iv)” for “relief under paragraphs (ii) or (iv) of Section 79-4-14.30(a)(2)” in the last sentence of (e); and made minor stylistic changes in (f) and (h).

The 2007 amendment deleted “that is not a public corporation” following “dissolve a corporation” in the first sentence of (a).

Required notice, upon commencement of proceeding to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, of option to avoid dissolution by elective buyout of petitioner’s shares under § 79-4-14.34, see § 79-4-14.31.

Judicial dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-355 through 79-11-361.

Appellant stated a claim for dissolution of the corporation because the agreement in question might be invalid as applied to appellant due to oppressive or fraudulent conduct, in which case she would be entitled to the fair value of her share, and dismissal of her claim was reversed; other shareholders offered her only $ 900,000 for her share, when she allegedly had been offered $ 1.5 million by an outsider, and there was a question of fact whether the price had been previously set at an annual meeting by secret ballot. Chain v. Ormonde Plantation, Inc., — So.3d —, 2020 Miss. App. LEXIS 98 (Miss. Ct. App. Mar. 31, 2020).

In a proceeding relating to the dissolution of a closely held corporation, the court properly awarded accounting and legal fees to be recovered from the assets of the corporation, rather than from an improperly acting shareholder/officer of the corporation. Covington v. Covington, 780 So. 2d 665, 2001 Miss. App. LEXIS 114 (Miss. Ct. App. 2001).

Chancellor’s corporate dissolution order did not exceed the pleadings because (1) such a claim was adequately pled, (2) the chancellor did not have to grant an election to purchase shares before exercising broad equity powers under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.34(i), (3) the chancellor could grant alternate remedies, since dissolution was not ordered, and (4) fiduciary breach was adequately claimed. Scafidi v. Hille, 180 So.3d 634, 2015 Miss. LEXIS 603 (Miss. 2015).

When a shareholder sought a family corporation’s judicial dissolution in chancery court, a decree awarding the shareholder an in-kind division of the corporation’s land was not unauthorized, even after siblings invoked their right to purchase the shareholder’s shares, because Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.34(i) said nothing in Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.34 diminished the chancellor’s equity powers to fashion an alternate remedy. Rainbow Ranch, Inc. v. Hardin (In re Will of Hardin), 158 So.3d 341, 2014 Miss. App. LEXIS 401 (Miss. Ct. App. 2014), cert. denied, — So.3d —, 2015 Miss. LEXIS 120 (Miss. 2015).

Meaning of “book value” of corporate stock.
51 A.L.R.2d 606.

Dissolving or winding up affairs of corporation domiciled in another state. 19 A.L.R.3d 1279.

Valuation of corporate stock under “buy-out” or “first option” agreement giving option to or requiring corporation or other stockholders to purchase stock of deceased or withdrawing stockholders.
54 A.L.R.3d 790.

What constitutes waiver of stockholder’s or corporation’s right to enforce first-option stock purchase agreement.
55 A.L.R.3d 723.

What amounts to “oppressive” conduct under statute authorizing dissolution of corporation at suit of minority stockholders.
56 A.L.R.3d 358.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension.
83 A.L.R.3d 458.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2348 et seq.

3 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 379, Waiver of Right to Enforce “First Option” Stock Purchase Requirement.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 914-916 et seq.